Utah statutes.
73-4-1.   By engineer on petition of users -- Upon request of Department of
Environmental Quality.
(1)  Upon a verified petition to the state engineer, signed by five or more or
a majority of water users upon any stream or water source, requesting the
investigation of the relative rights of the various claimants to the waters of
such stream or water source, it shall be the duty of the state engineer, if
upon such investigation he finds the facts and conditions are such as to
justify a determination of said rights, to file in the district court an
action to determine the various rights. In any suit involving water rights the
court may order an investigation and survey by the state engineer of all the
water rights on the source or system involved.
(2) (a)  As used in this section, "executive director" means the executive
director of the Department of Environmental Quality.
(b)  The executive director, with the concurrence of the governor, may request
that the state engineer file in the district court an action to determine the
various water rights in the stream, water source, or basin for an area within
the exterior boundaries of the state for which any person or organization or
the federal government is actively pursuing or processing a license
application for a storage facility or transfer facility for high-level nuclear
waste or greater than class C radioactive waste.
(c)  Upon receipt of a request made under Subsection (2)(b), the state
engineer shall file the action in the district court.
(d)  If a general adjudication has been filed in the state district court
regarding the area requested pursuant to Subsection (2)(b), the state engineer
and the state attorney general shall join the United States as a party to the
action.
